Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.135

Vacancies.

Any vacancy occurring in the board of directors and any directorship to be filled by reason of an increase in the number of directors may be filled by the board of directors unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws provide that a vacancy or directorship so created shall be filled in some other manner. A director elected or appointed, as the case may be, to fill a vacancy, shall be elected or appointed for the unexpired term of his or her predecessor in office.

[ 2011 c 336 s 666; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 27.]